Washington statutes.
RCW 39.10.903

Part headings and captions not law—2007 c 494.

Part headings and captions used in chapter 494, Laws of 2007 are not any part of the law.

[ 2007 c 494 s 510.]

NOTES:

Sunset Act application: See note following chapter digest.